Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Chapter 31. Sex Offense Criminal History Record Information Act

§§ 45-31-1 through 45-31-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2000, ch. 415, § 8, and ch. 499, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§45-31-1. [Laws, 1987, ch. 465, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1987.]

§45-31-3. [Laws, 1987, ch. 465, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 448, § 2, eff. from and after July 1, 1991.]

§45-31-5. [Laws, 1987, ch. 465, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1987.]

§45-31-7. [Laws, 1987, ch. 465, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1987.]

§45-31-9. [Laws, 1987, ch. 465, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1987.]

§45-31-11. [Laws, 1987, ch. 465, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1987.]

§45-31-12. [Laws, 1993, ch. 512, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 479, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 327, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 329, § 6; Laws, 1999, ch. 330, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.]

§45-31-13. [Laws, 1987, ch. 465, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1987.]

§45-31-15. [Laws, 1987, ch. 465, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1987.]

§45-31-17. [Laws, 1987, ch. 465, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1987.]

§45-31-19. [Laws, 1987, ch. 465, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1987.]